Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 3. Management of the Common Interest Community.
Sec. 34.08.460.
Assessments for common expenses.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After an assessment has been made by the association, assessments must be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least annually by the association.

Except for assessments under (c) — (e) of this section, all common expenses must be assessed against each unit in accordance with the allocations set out in the declaration under AS

34.08.150(a)

and (b). A past due common expense assessment or an installment of the assessment bears interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding 18 percent per year.

To the extent required by the declaration

a common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element must be assessed against each unit to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in proportion provided by the declaration;

a common expense or portion of the common expense benefiting fewer than all of the units must be assessed exclusively against the units benefited;

the costs of insurance must be assessed in proportion to risk; and

the costs of utilities that can be determined must be assessed in proportion to usage and if the costs of utilities cannot be determined, the cost of nondeterminable utilities shall be shared as a common expense.

An assessment to pay a judgment against the association may be made only against the units in the common interest community at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If a common expense is caused by the misconduct of a unit owner, the association may assess that expense exclusively against the unit.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment of the assessment not yet due must be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.470.
Lien for assessments.

The association has a lien on a unit for an assessment levied against the unit or fines imposed against its unit owner from the time the assessment or fine becomes due. Unless the declaration otherwise provides, fees, charges, late charges, fines, and interest charged under AS

34.08.320(a)(10)

— (12) are enforceable as assessments under this section. If an assessment is payable in installments, the full amount of the assessment is a lien from the time the first installment becomes due.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a unit except (1) a lien and encumbrance recorded before the recordation of the declaration and, in a cooperative, a lien and encumbrance which the association creates, assumes, or takes subject to; (2) a first security interest on the unit recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent, or, in a cooperative, the first security interest encumbering only the interest of the unit owner and perfected before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and (3) a lien for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit or cooperative. A lien under this section is also prior to all security interests described in (2) of this subsection if the common expense assessments based on the periodic budget adopted by the association under AS

34.08.460(a)

would have become due in the absence of acceleration during the six months immediately preceding institution of an action to enforce the lien. This subsection does not affect the priority of a mechanic’s or materialman’s lien, or the priority of a lien for other assessments made by the association. A lien under this section is not subject to the provisions of AS

09.38.010

.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, if two or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same property, each lien has equal priority.

The recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien. Further recording of a claim of lien for assessment under this section is not required.

A lien for an unpaid assessment is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within three years after the full amount of the assessment becomes due.

This section does not prohibit an action to recover sums for which (a) of this section creates a lien or prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

A judgment or decree in an action brought under this section is enforceable by execution under AS

09.35.010

.

The association upon written request shall furnish to a unit owner a statement setting out the amount of unpaid assessments against the unit. If the interest of the unit owner is real estate, the statement must be in recordable form. The statement must be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the executive board, and each unit owner.

In a cooperative, upon nonpayment of an assessment on a unit, a unit owner may be evicted in the same manner as provided by law in the case of an unlawful holdover by a commercial tenant, and the lien may be foreclosed under this section.

The association’s lien may be foreclosed under this subsection as follows:

in a condominium or planned community, the lien of the association must be foreclosed as a lien is foreclosed under AS

34.35.005

;

in a cooperative whose unit owners’ interests in the units are real estate, the lien of the association must be foreclosed as a mortgage or deed of trust on real estate is foreclosed or as a lien is foreclosed under AS

34.35.005

; or

in a cooperative whose unit owners’ interests in the units are personal property, the lien of the association must be foreclosed as a security interest under AS 45.29.

In a cooperative, if the interest of the unit owner in a unit is real estate,

the association, upon nonpayment of an assessment and compliance with this subsection, may sell the unit at a public sale or by private negotiation, and at any time and place; each aspect of the sale, including the method, advertising, time, place, and terms must be reasonable; the association shall give reasonable written notice to the unit owner and a lessee of the unit owner of the time and place of the public sale or, if a private sale is intended, of the intention of entering into a contract to sell and of the time after which a private disposition may be made; the same notice must also be sent to any other person who has a recorded interest in the unit that would be cut off by the sale, but only if the recorded interest was on record seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date of a public sale or seven weeks before the date specified in the notice as the date after which a private sale may be made; the notices required by this subsection may be sent to any address reasonable in the circumstances; sale may not be held until five weeks after the sending of the notice; the association may buy at a public sale and, if the sale is conducted by a fiduciary or other person not related to the association, at a private sale;

unless otherwise agreed, the debtor is liable for any deficiency in a foreclosure sale under AS

09.45.170

;

the proceeds of a foreclosure sale must be applied in the following order:

the reasonable expenses of sale;

the reasonable expenses of securing possession before sale including holding, maintaining, and preparing the unit for sale, payment of taxes and other governmental charges, premiums on hazard and liability insurance;

satisfaction of the lien of the association;

satisfaction in the order of priority of a subordinate claim of record; and

remittance of any excess to the unit owner;

a good faith purchaser for value acquires the unit free of the association’s debt that gave rise to the lien under which the foreclosure sale occurred and any subordinate interest, even though the association or other person conducting the sale failed to comply with the requirements of this section; the person conducting the sale shall execute a conveyance to the purchaser sufficient to convey the unit and stating that it is executed after a foreclosure of the association’s lien by power of sale and that person conducting the sale was empowered to make the sale; signature and title or authority of the person signing the conveyance as grantor and a recital of the facts of nonpayment of the assessment and of the giving of the notices required by this subsection are sufficient proof of the facts recited and of the authority of the person to sign; further proof of authority is not required even if the association is named as grantee in the conveyance;

at any time before the association has disposed of a unit in a cooperative or entered into a contract for its disposition under the power of sale, the unit owner or the holder of a subordinate security interest may cure the default of the unit owner and prevent sale or other disposition by tendering the performance due under the security agreement, including an amount due because of exercise of a right to accelerate, plus the reasonable expenses of proceeding to foreclosure incurred to the time of tender.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 61 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.09” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 34.08.480.
Other liens.

In a condominium or planned community,

except as provided in (2) of this subsection, a recorded judgment for money against the association is not a lien on the common elements, but is a lien in favor of the judgment lien holder against the units in the common interest community at the time the judgment was entered and no other property of a unit owner is subject to the claims of creditors of the association;

if the association has granted a security interest in the common elements to a creditor of the association under AS

34.08.430

, the holder of the security interest shall exercise its right against the common elements before its judgment lien on a unit may be enforced;

whether perfected before or after the creation of the common interest community, if a lien, other than a deed of trust or mortgage including a judgment lien or lien attributable to work performed or materials supplied before creation of the common interest community, becomes effective against two or more units, the unit owner of an affected unit may pay to the lien holder the amount of the lien attributable to the unit, and the lien holder, upon receipt of payment, shall promptly deliver a release of the lien covering the unit; the amount of the payment must be proportionate to the ratio that the unit owner’s common expense liability bears to the common expense liabilities of all unit owners whose units are subject to the lien; after payment, the association may not assess or have a lien against the unit owner’s unit for any portion of the common expenses incurred in connection with the lien;

a judgment against the association must be indexed in the name of the common interest community and the association and, when so indexed, is notice of the lien against the units.

In a cooperative,

if the association receives notice of an impending foreclosure on all or a portion of the association’s real estate, the association shall promptly transmit a copy of the notice to each unit owner of a unit located within the real estate to be foreclosed; a failure of the association to transmit the notice does not affect the validity of the foreclosure;

whether or not the property of a unit owner is subject to the claims of creditors of the association, other property of a unit owner is not subject to the claims.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.490.
Association records.

The association shall keep financial records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with AS

34.08.590

. Financial and other records must be made reasonably available for examination by a unit owner and an authorized agent of a unit owner.

A professional manager, managing agent, accountant, or other person with whom the association has contracted for services shall return all association records within five days of the termination of the contract. If the association records are not returned within five days, the association may sue for their return and for damages.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)

Sec. 34.08.500.
Association as trustee.

If a third person deals with the association in the capacity of the association as a trustee, the existence of trust powers and their proper exercise by the association may be assumed without inquiry.
A third person is not bound to inquire whether the association has power to act as trustee or is properly exercising trust powers. A third person, without actual knowledge that the association is exceeding or improperly exercising its powers, is fully protected in dealing with the association as if it possessed and properly exercised the powers it purports to exercise.
A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the association in its capacity as trustee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1985)